Wyoming, session 2025, SF0150.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xxv), by creating a new
paragraph (xlvi) and by creating a new subsection (c) is
amended to read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.
SF0150

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0735

(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:

(xxv) Property used for schools, museums, orphan
asylums or hospitals to the extent they are not used for
private profit, except as provided in paragraph (xlvi) of
this subsection. As used in this paragraph, "museum" means
as defined in W.S. 34-23-101(a)(iv);

(xlvi) Tangible personal property and real
property of for-profit trade schools, in accordance with
subsection (c) of this section.

(c) Real property and tangible personal property
owned by a for-profit trade school is exempt from taxation
under paragraph (a)(xlvi) of this section, in accordance
with all of the following:

(i) As used in this subsection, "for-profit
trade school" means a vocational, technical or trade school
located in Wyoming that is operated for profit;

SF0150

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0735
(ii) To qualify for the exemption under this
subsection, the for-profit trade school shall:

(A) Be a registered business entity in
Wyoming and in good standing with the secretary of state;

(B) Be physically located in Wyoming;

(C) Be operated for the primary purpose of
providing postsecondary technical, vocational or
career-technical education;

(D) Offer programs or certifications
aligned with workforce development needs, as determined by
the department of workforce services;

(E) Maintain accreditation by a nationally
or regionally recognized accrediting body or meet
equivalent standards established by the Wyoming department
of education.

(iii) The exemption shall apply only to all
tangible personal property and real property of the
SF0150

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0735
for-profit trade school physically located in Wyoming and
that is used exclusively for educational purposes by the
for-profit trade school;

(iv) Tangible personal property and real
property used by the for-profit trade school for commercial
purposes unrelated to education and instruction shall not
qualify for the exemption;

(v) To qualify for the exemption under this
subsection, a for-profit trade school shall apply for the
exemption on a form and in a manner determined by the
department. The application shall include, at a minimum,
accreditation documentation, a description of the property
for which the exemption is sought and its primary use and
proof of qualification under paragraph (ii) of this
subsection;

(vi) If the department concludes that the
for-profit trade school is eligible for the exemption under
this subsection, the exemption shall apply for five (5) tax
years, subject to paragraph (viii) of this subsection. Each
for-profit trade school shall provide annual updates to the
SF0150

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0735
department and the applicable county assessor on the
property that qualifies for the exemption;

(vii) To continue or renew an exemption under
this subsection, a for-profit trade school granted an
exemption under this subsection shall apply to renew the
exemption not less than six (6) months before the exemption
expires;

(viii) The appropriate county assessor or the
department may audit for-profit trade schools qualifying
for the exemption under this subsection. Any for-profit
trade school that has received the exemption in violation
of this subsection shall be subject to enforcement
available under this act.

Section 2. The legislature finds that for-profit
trade schools play a vital role in preparing Wyoming
residents for careers in high-demand industries, supporting
workforce development and contributing to the state's
economic growth. The purpose of this act is to encourage
the operation and expansion of for-profit trade schools in
Wyoming for purposes of economic development, which
SF0150

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0735
constitutes a valid public purpose that is of primary
benefit to all citizens of the state of Wyoming.

Section 3. The department of revenue shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective January 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0150